Massachusetts, session 194th, H231.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. An acquired brain injury advisory board shall be established to collaborate
with appropriate state secretariats and their agencies, members of the legislature, individuals with
acquired brain injuries and their family members, providers, clinicians, advocacy groups and
other key stakeholders to review, advise, and report on services and supports, and public policy
there under for individuals with acquired brain injuries and their families.
SECTION 2: Said advisory board shall consist of 2 members of the Senate, 1 of whom
shall be appointed by the President, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader; 2
members of the House of Representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker, 1 of
whom shall be appointed by the Minority Leader; the Secretary of Health and Human Services or
their designee; the Secretary of the Executive Office of Public Safety or their designee; the
Secretary of Elder Affairs or their designee; the Secretary of Veterans Services or their designee;
of 3

the Commissioner of the Department of Public Health or their designee; 2 members from the
MassAbility, 1 who shall be the Commissioner or their designee, 1 who shall be appointed by the
Commissioner; the Commissioner of the Department of Developmental Services or their
designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health or their designee; 2 members of
the MassHealth, 1 who shall be the Director or their designee, and 1 who shall be the Director of
Home and Community-Based Services Waiver Administration or their designee; the
Commissioner of the Division of Insurance or their designee, the Executive Director of the
Center for Health Information and Analysis (CHIA) or their designee, the Chief Executive
Officer at the Brain Injury Association of Massachusetts, Inc. or their designee; and 8 members
who shall be appointed by the Governor, 2 of whom shall be family members, caretakers or
significant others of a person with acquired brain injury, 2 of whom shall be individuals with
acquired brain injury, including but not limited to individuals who have experienced traumatic
brain injury, stroke, brain tumors or other disorders, 1 of whom shall be a community based
provider of services to individuals with acquired brain injury 1 of whom shall be a community
based provider of services to individuals with acquired brain injury serving minorities and other
underserved populations, 1 of whom shall be from a disability advisory group or a protection and
advocacy representative, 1 of whom shall be a clinician.
SECTION 3. Said advisory board directives shall include, but are not limited to,
reviewing data concerning the epidemiology of acquired brain injury and the needs of
individuals with acquired brain injury and their families; reviewing efforts to increase access to
rehabilitative, residential and integrated community based support services for persons with
acquired brain injury; monitoring the implementation of the acquired brain injury commission
of 3

recommendations regarding the improvement of such services; and reviewing ongoing state
public policy initiatives and state funding.
SECTION 4: Said advisory board shall file a biennial report with the Governor, the
Secretary of the Executive Office of Health and Human Services, the Senate President, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the clerks of the Senate and House of
Representatives. Said report shall include but not be limited to a summary of ongoing needs of
individuals with acquired brain injury, the status of progress made in increasing access to
rehabilitative, residential and integrated community-based support services for individuals with
acquired brain injury; and the status of progress made in implementing the acquired brain injury
commission recommendations regarding the improvement of such services.
SECTION 5. Said advisory board shall meet quarterly, at minimum, and may establish
subcommittees as necessary to carry out its objectives.
of 3